Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2271.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 40-110 is hereby amended to read as
follows: 40-110. (a) The commissioner of insurance is hereby authorized
to appoint an assistant commissioner of insurance, actuaries, two special
attorneys who shall have been regularly admitted to practice, an executive
secretary, policy examiners, two field representatives, and a secretary to
the commissioner. Such appointees shall each receive an annual salary to
be determined by the commissioner of insurance, within the limits of
available appropriations. The commissioner is also authorized to appoint,
within the provisions of the civil service law, and available appropriations,
other employees as necessary to administer the provisions of this act. The
field representatives authorized by this section may be empowered to
conduct inquiries, investigations or to receive complaints. Such field

HB 2271 2
representatives shall not be empowered to make, or direct to be made, an
examination of the affairs and financial condition of any insurance
company in the process of organization, or applying for admission or
doing business in this state.
(b) The appointees authorized by this section shall take the proper
official oath and shall be in no way interested, except as policyholders, in
any insurance company. In the absence of the commissioner of insurance
the assistant commissioner shall perform the duties of the commissioner of
insurance, but shall in all cases execute papers in the name of the
commissioner of insurance, as assistant. The commissioner of insurance
shall be responsible for all acts of an official nature done and performed by
the commissioner's assistant or any person employed in such office. All the
appointees authorized by this section shall hold their office at the will and
pleasure of the commissioner of insurance.
(c) (1) The commissioner shall appoint a chief information security
officer who shall be responsible for establishing security standards and
policies to protect the department's information technology systems and
infrastructure. The chief information security officer shall:
(A)(1) Develop a cybersecurity program for the department that
complies with the national institute of standards and technology
cybersecurity framework (CSF) 2.0, as in effect on July 1, 2024. The chief
information security officer shall ensure that such programs achieve a CSF
tier of 3.0 prior to July 1, 2028, and a CSF tier of 4.0 prior to July 1, 2030;
(B)(2) ensure that the commissioner and all employees complete
cybersecurity awareness training annually and that if an employee does not
complete the required training, such employee's access to any state-issued
hardware or the state network is revoked; and
(C) (i) (a)(3) (A) (i) coordinate with the United States cybersecurity
and infrastructure security agency to perform annual audits of the
department for compliance with applicable state and federal laws, rules
and regulations and department policies and standards; and
(b)(ii) make an audit request to such agency annually, regardless of
whether or not such agency has the capacity to perform the requested
audit.
(ii)(B) Results of audits conducted pursuant to this paragraph shall be
confidential and shall not be subject to discovery or disclosure pursuant to
the open records act, K.S.A. 45-215 et seq., and amendments thereto.
(2) The provisions of this subsection shall expire on July 1, 2026.
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 75-413 is hereby amended to read as
follows: 75-413. (a) The secretary of state may appoint such other
assistants and clerks as may be authorized by law, but the secretary of state
shall be responsible for the proper discharge of the duties of all assistants
and clerks, and they shall hold their offices at the will and pleasure of the

HB 2271 3
secretary and shall do and perform such general duties as the secretary
may require.
(b) (1) The secretary of state shall appoint a chief information
security officer who shall be responsible for establishing security standards
and policies to protect the office's information technology systems and
infrastructure. The chief information security officer shall:
(A)(1) Develop a cybersecurity program for the office that complies
with the national institute of standards and technology cybersecurity
framework (CSF) 2.0, as in effect on July 1, 2024. The chief information
security officer shall ensure that such programs achieve a CSF tier of 3.0
prior to July 1, 2028, and a CSF tier of 4.0 prior to July 1, 2030;
(B)(2) ensure that the secretary of state and all employees complete
cybersecurity awareness training annually and that if an employee does not
complete the required training, such employee's access to any state-issued
hardware or the state network is revoked; and
(C) (i) (a)(3) (A) (i) coordinate with the United States cybersecurity
and infrastructure security agency to perform annual audits of the office
for compliance with applicable state and federal laws, rules and
regulations and office policies and standards; and
(b)(ii) make an audit request to such agency annually, regardless of
whether or not such agency has the capacity to perform the requested
audit.
(ii)(B) Results of audits conducted pursuant to this paragraph shall be
confidential and shall not be subject to discovery or disclosure pursuant to
the open records act, K.S.A. 45-215 et seq., and amendments thereto.
(2) The provisions of this subsection shall expire on July 1, 2026.
Sec. 3. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 75-623 is hereby amended to read as
follows: 75-623. (a) The treasurer shall appoint such other assistants,
clerks, bookkeepers, accountants and stenographers as may be authorized
by law, each of which persons shall take the oath of office required of
public officers. Such persons shall hold their offices at the will and
pleasure of the state treasurer.
(b) (1) The treasurer shall appoint a chief information security officer
who shall be responsible for establishing security standards and policies to
protect the office's information technology systems and infrastructure. The
chief information security officer shall:
(A)(1) Develop a cybersecurity program for the office that complies
with the national institute of standards and technology cybersecurity
framework (CSF) 2.0, as in effect on July 1, 2024. The chief information
security officer shall ensure that such programs achieve a CSF tier of 3.0
prior to July 1, 2028, and a CSF tier of 4.0 prior to July 1, 2030;
(B)(2) ensure that the treasurer and all employees complete
cybersecurity awareness training annually and that if an employee does not

HB 2271 4
complete the required training, such employee's access to any state-issued
hardware or the state network is revoked; and
(C) (i) (a)(3) (A) (i) coordinate with the United States cybersecurity
and infrastructure security agency to perform annual audits of the office
for compliance with applicable state and federal laws, rules and
regulations and office policies and standards; and
(b)(ii) make an audit request to such agency annually, regardless of
whether or not such agency has the capacity to perform the requested
audit.
(ii)(B) Results of audits conducted pursuant to this paragraph shall be
confidential and shall not be subject to discovery or disclosure pursuant to
the open records act, K.S.A. 45-215 et seq., and amendments thereto.
(2) The provisions of this subsection shall expire on July 1, 2026.
Sec. 4. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 75-710 is hereby amended to read as
follows: 75-710. (a) The attorney general shall appoint such assistants,
clerks, and stenographers as shall be authorized by law, and who shall hold
their office at the will and pleasure of the attorney general. All fees and
allowances earned by said assistants or any of them, or allowed to them by
any statute or order of court in any civil or criminal case whatsoever, shall
be turned into the general revenue fund of the state treasury, and the
vouchers for their monthly salaries shall not be honored by the director of
accounts and reports until a verified account of the fees collected by them,
or either of them, during the preceding month, has been filed in the
director of accounts and reports' office. Assistants appointed by the
attorney general shall perform the duties and exercise the powers as
prescribed by law and shall perform other duties as prescribed by the
attorney general. Assistants shall act for and exercise the power of the
attorney general to the extent the attorney general delegates them the
authority to do so.
(b) (1) The attorney general shall appoint a chief information security
officer who shall be responsible for establishing security standards and
policies to protect the office's information technology systems and
infrastructure. The chief information security officer shall:
(A)(1) Develop a cybersecurity program for the office that complies
with the national institute of standards and technology cybersecurity
framework (CSF) 2.0, as in effect on July 1, 2024. The chief information
security officer shall ensure that such programs achieve a CSF tier of 3.0
prior to July 1, 2028, and a CSF tier of 4.0 prior to July 1, 2030;
(B)(2) ensure that the attorney general and all employees complete
cybersecurity awareness training annually and that if an employee does not
complete the required training, such employee's access to any state-issued
hardware or the state network is revoked; and
(C) (i) (a)(3) (A) (i) coordinate with the United States cybersecurity

HB 2271 5
and infrastructure security agency to perform annual audits of the office
for compliance with applicable state and federal laws, rules and
regulations and office policies and standards; and
(b)(ii) make an audit request to such agency annually, regardless of
whether or not such agency has the capacity to perform the requested
audit.
(ii)(B) Results of audits conducted pursuant to this paragraph shall be
confidential and shall not be subject to discovery or disclosure pursuant to
the open records act, K.S.A. 45-215 et seq., and amendments thereto.
(2) The provisions of this subsection shall expire on July 1, 2026.
Sec. 5. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 75-711 is hereby amended to read as
follows: 75-711. (a) There is hereby established, under the jurisdiction of
the attorney general, a division to be known as the Kansas bureau of
investigation. The director of the bureau shall be appointed by the attorney
general, subject to confirmation by the senate as provided in K.S.A. 75-
4315b, and amendments thereto, and shall have special training and
qualifications for such position. Except as provided by K.S.A. 46-2601,
and amendments thereto, no person appointed as director shall exercise
any power, duty or function as director until confirmed by the senate. In
accordance with appropriation acts, the director shall appoint agents who
shall be trained in the detection and apprehension of criminals. The
director shall appoint an associate director, and any such assistant directors
from within the agency as are necessary for the efficient operation of the
bureau, who shall have the qualifications and employee benefits, including
longevity, of an agent. The director also may appoint a deputy director
and, in accordance with appropriation acts, such administrative employees
as are necessary for the efficient operation of the bureau. No person shall
be appointed to a position within the Kansas bureau of investigation if the
person has been convicted of a felony.
(b) The director, associate director, deputy director, assistant directors
and any assistant attorneys general assigned to the bureau shall be within
the unclassified service under the Kansas civil service act. All other agents
and employees of the bureau shall be in the classified service under the
Kansas civil service act and their compensation shall be determined as
provided in the Kansas civil service act and shall receive actual and
necessary expenses.
(c) Any person who was a member of the bureau at the time of
appointment as director, associate director or assistant director, upon the
expiration of their appointment, shall be returned to an unclassified or
regular classified position under the Kansas civil service act with
compensation comparable to and not lower than compensation being
received at the time of appointment to the unclassified service. If all such
possible positions are filled at that time, a temporary additional position

HB 2271 6
shall be created for the person until a vacancy exists in the position. While
serving in the temporary additional position, the person shall continue to
be a contributing member of the retirement system for the agents of the
Kansas bureau of investigation.
(d) Each agent of the bureau shall subscribe to an oath to faithfully
discharge the duties of such agent's office, as is required of other public
officials.
(e) (1) The director shall appoint a chief information security officer
who shall be responsible for establishing security standards and policies to
protect the bureau's information technology systems and infrastructure.
The chief information security officer shall:
(A)(1) Develop a cybersecurity program for the bureau that complies
with the national institute of standards and technology cybersecurity
framework (CSF) 2.0, as in effect on July 1, 2024. The chief information
security officer shall ensure that such programs achieve a CSF tier of 3.0
prior to July 1, 2028, and a CSF tier of 4.0 prior to July 1, 2030;
(B)(2) ensure that the director and all employees complete
cybersecurity awareness training annually and that if an employee does not
complete the required training, such employee's access to any state-issued
hardware or the state network is revoked; and
(C) (i) (a)(3) (A) (i) coordinate with the United States cybersecurity
and infrastructure security agency to perform annual audits of the
department for compliance with applicable state and federal laws, rules
and regulations and department policies and standards; and
(b)(ii) make an audit request to such agency annually, regardless of
whether or not such agency has the capacity to perform the requested
audit.
(ii)(B) Results of audits conducted pursuant to this paragraph shall be
confidential and shall not be subject to discovery or disclosure pursuant to
the open records act, K.S.A. 45-215 et seq., and amendments thereto.
(2) The provisions of this subsection shall expire on July 1, 2026.
Sec. 6. K.S.A. 75-7203 is hereby amended to read as follows: 75-
7203. (a) The information technology executive council is hereby
authorized to adopt such policies and rules and regulations as necessary to
implement, administer and enforce the provisions of this act.
(b) The council shall:
(1) Adopt:
(A) Information technology resource policies and procedures and
project management methodologies for all executive branch agencies;
(B) an information technology architecture, including
telecommunications systems, networks and equipment, that covers all state
agencies;
(C) standards for data management for all executive branch agencies;

HB 2271 7
and
(D) a strategic information technology management plan for the
executive branch;
(2) provide direction and coordination for the application of the
executive branch's information technology resources;
(3) designate the ownership of information resource processes and the
lead executive branch agency for implementation of new technologies and
networks shared by multiple agencies within the executive branch of state
government;
(4) develop a plan to integrate all information technology services for
the executive branch into the office of information technology services and
all cybersecurity services for state educational institutions as defined in
K.S.A. 76-711, and amendments thereto, into the office of information
technology services and the Kansas information security office; and
(5) perform such other functions and duties as necessary to carry out
the provisions of this act.
(c) The information technology executive council shall report the
plan developed under subsection (b)(4) to the senate standing committee
on ways and means and, the house standing committee on legislative
modernization or its successor committee and the joint committee on
information technology prior to January 15, 2026, in accordance with
K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 75-7245, and amendments thereto.
Sec. 7. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 75-7206a is hereby amended to read as
follows: 75-7206a. (a) There is hereby established the position of judicial
branch chief information security officer. The judicial chief information
security officer shall be in the unclassified service under the Kansas civil
service act, shall be appointed by the judicial administrator, subject to
approval by the chief justice and shall receive compensation determined
by the judicial administrator, subject to approval of the chief justice.
(b) The judicial chief information security officer shall:
(1) Report to the judicial administrator;
(2) establish security standards and policies to protect the branch's
information technology systems and infrastructure in accordance with
subsection (c);
(3) ensure the confidentiality, availability and integrity of the
information transacted, stored or processed in the branch's information
technology systems and infrastructure;
(4) develop a centralized cybersecurity protocol for protecting and
managing judicial branch information technology assets and infrastructure;
(5) detect and respond to security incidents consistent with
information security standards and policies;
(6) be responsible for the cybersecurity of all judicial branch data and
information resources;

HB 2271 8
(7) collaborate with the chief information security officers of the
other branches of state government to respond to cybersecurity incidents;
(8) ensure that all justices, judges and judicial branch employees
complete cybersecurity awareness training annually and if an employee
does not complete the required training, such employee's access to any
state-issued hardware or the state network is revoked;
(9) review all contracts related to information technology entered into
by a person or entity within the judicial branch to make efforts to reduce
the risk of security vulnerabilities within the supply chain or product and
ensure each contract contains standard security language; and
(10) coordinate with the United States cybersecurity and
infrastructure security agency to perform annual audits of judicial branch
agencies for compliance with applicable state and federal laws, rules and
regulations and judicial branch policies and standards. The judicial chief
information security officer shall make an audit request to such agency
annually, regardless of whether or not such agency has the capacity to
perform the requested audit.
(c) The judicial chief information security officer shall develop a
cybersecurity program of each judicial agency that complies with the
national institute of standards and technology cybersecurity framework
(CSF) 2.0, as in effect on July 1, 2024. The judicial chief information
security officer shall ensure that such programs achieve a CSF tier of 3.0
prior to July 1, 2028, and a CSF tier of 4.0 prior to July 1, 2030.
(d) (1) If an audit conducted pursuant to subsection (b)(10) results in
a failure, the judicial chief information security officer shall report such
failure to the speaker and minority leader of the house of representatives
and the president and minority leader of the senate within 30 days of
receiving notice of such failure. Such report shall contain a plan to
mitigate any security risks identified in the audit. The judicial chief
information security officer shall coordinate for an additional audit after
the mitigation plan is implemented and report the results of such audit to
the speaker and minority leader of the house of representatives and the
president and minority leader of the senate.
(2) Results of audits conducted pursuant to subsection (b)(10) and the
reports described in subsection (d)(1) shall be confidential and shall not be
subject to discovery or disclosure pursuant to the open records act, K.S.A.
45-215 et seq., and amendments thereto.
(e) This section shall expire on July 1, 2026.
Sec. 8. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 75-7208a is hereby amended to read as
follows: 75-7208a. (a) There is hereby established the position of
legislative branch chief information security officer. The legislative chief
information security officer shall be in the unclassified service under the
Kansas civil service act, shall be appointed by the legislative coordinating

HB 2271 9
council and shall receive compensation determined by the legislative
coordinating council.
(b) The legislative chief information security officer shall:
(1) Report to the legislative chief information technology officer;
(2) establish security standards and policies to protect the branch's
information technology systems and infrastructure in accordance with
subsection (c);
(3) ensure the confidentiality, availability and integrity of the
information transacted, stored or processed in the branch's information
technology systems and infrastructure;
(4) develop a centralized cybersecurity protocol for protecting and
managing legislative branch information technology assets and
infrastructure;
(5) detect and respond to security incidents consistent with
information security standards and policies;
(6) be responsible for the cybersecurity of all legislative branch data
and information resources and obtain approval from the revisor of statutes
prior to taking any action on any matter that involves a legal issue related
to the security of information technology;
(7) collaborate with the chief information security officers of the
other branches of state government to respond to cybersecurity incidents;
(8) ensure that all legislators and legislative branch employees
complete cybersecurity awareness training annually and if an employee
does not complete the required training, such employee's access to any
state-issued hardware or the state network is revoked;
(9) review all contracts related to information technology entered into
by a person or entity within the legislative branch to make efforts to reduce
the risk of security vulnerabilities within the supply chain or product and
ensure each contract contains standard security language; and
(10) coordinate with the United States cybersecurity and
infrastructure security agency to perform annual audits of legislative
branch agencies for compliance with applicable state and federal laws,
rules and regulations and legislative branch policies and standards. The
legislative chief information security officer shall make an audit request to
such agency annually, regardless of whether or not such agency has the
capacity to perform the requested audit.
(c) The legislative chief information security officer shall develop a
cybersecurity program of each legislative agency that complies with the
national institute of standards and technology cybersecurity framework
(CSF) 2.0, as in effect on July 1, 2024. The legislative chief information
security officer shall ensure that such programs achieve a CSF tier of 3.0
prior to July 1, 2028, and a CSF tier of 4.0 prior to July 1, 2030. The
agency head of each legislative agency shall coordinate with the legislative

HB 2271 10
chief information security officer to achieve such standards.
(d) (1) If an audit conducted pursuant to subsection (b)(10) results in
a failure, the legislative chief information security officer shall report such
failure to the speaker and minority leader of the house of representatives
and the president and minority leader of the senate within 30 days of
receiving notice of such failure. Such report shall contain a plan to
mitigate any security risks identified in the audit. The legislative chief
information security officer shall coordinate for an additional audit after
the mitigation plan is implemented and report the results of such audit to
the speaker and minority leader of the house of representatives and the
president and minority leader of the senate.
(2) Results of audits conducted pursuant to subsection (b)(10) and the
reports described in subsection (d)(1) shall be confidential and shall not be
subject to discovery or disclosure pursuant to the open records act, K.S.A.
45-215 et seq., and amendments thereto.
(e) This section shall expire on July 1, 2026.
Sec. 9. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 75-7245 is hereby amended to read as
follows: 75-7245. (a) On and after July 1, 2027, all cybersecurity services
for each branch of state government shall be administered by the chief
information technology officer and the chief information security officer of
such branch. All cybersecurity employees within the legislative and
executive branches of state government shall work at the direction of the
chief information technology officer of the branch.
(b) Prior to January 1, 2026:
(1) The information technology executive council shall develop a
plan to integrate all executive branch information technology services into
the office of information technology services. The council shall consult
with each agency head when developing such plan.
(2) The judicial chief information technology officer shall develop an
estimated project cost to provide information technology to judicial
agencies and all employees of such agencies, including state and county-
funded judicial branch district court employees. Such employees shall be
required to use such state-issued information technology hardware. The
project cost developed pursuant to this paragraph shall include, in
consultation with the executive branch information technology officer, a
plan to allow each piece of information technology hardware that is used
by a judicial branch employee to access a judicial branch application to
have access to the KANWIN network and an estimated project cost to
develop a cybersecurity program for all judicial districts that complies
with the national institute of standards and technology cybersecurity
framework (CSF) 2.0, as in effect on July 1, 2024.
(c) The information technology executive council shall report the
plan developed pursuant to subsection (b) to the senate standing committee

HB 2271 11
on ways and means and, the house standing committee on legislative
modernization or its successor committee and the joint committee on
information technology, prior to January 15, 2026.
(d) Prior to February 1, 2025, every website that is maintained by a
branch of government or state agency shall be moved to a ".gov" domain.
(e) On July 1, 2025, and each year thereafter, moneys appropriated
from the state general fund to or any special revenue fund of any state
agency for information technology and cybersecurity expenditures shall be
appropriated as a separate line item and shall not be merged with other
items of appropriation for such state agency to allow for detailed review
by the senate committee on ways and means and the house of
representatives committee on appropriations during each regular
legislative session.
(f) The provisions of this section do not apply to state educational
institutions as defined in K.S.A. 76-711, and amendments thereto.
(g) This section shall expire on July 1, 2026.
Sec. 10. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 75-7246 is hereby amended to read as
follows: 75-7246. (a) On July 1, 2028, and each year thereafter, the
director of the budget, in consultation with the legislative, executive and
judicial chief information technology officers as appropriate, shall
determine if each state agency is in compliance with the provisions of this
act* for the previous fiscal year. If the director of the budget determines
that a state agency is not in compliance with the provisions of this act for
such fiscal year, the director shall certify an amount equal to 5% of the
amount:
(1) Appropriated and reappropriated from the state general fund for
such state agency for such fiscal year; and
(2) credited to and available in each special revenue fund for such
state agency in such fiscal year. If during any fiscal year, a special revenue
fund has no expenditure limitation, then an expenditure limitation shall be
established for such fiscal year on such special revenue fund by the
director of the budget in an amount that is 5% less than the amount of
moneys credited to and available in such special revenue fund for such
fiscal year.
(b) The director of the budget shall submit a detailed written report to
the legislature on or before the first day of the regular session of the
legislature concerning such compliance determinations, including factors
considered by the director when making such determination, and the
amounts certified for each state agency for such fiscal year.
(c) During the regular session of the legislature, the senate committee
on ways and means and the house of representatives committee on
appropriations shall consider such compliance determinations and whether
to lapse amounts appropriated and reappropriated and decrease the

HB 2271 12
expenditure limitations of special revenue funds for such state agencies
during the budget committee hearings for such noncomplying agency.
(d) This section shall expire on July 1, 2026.
Sec. 11. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 40-110, 45-229, as amended by section
11 of chapter 95 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas, 75-413, 75-623, 75-
710, 75-711, 75-7201, as amended by section 17 of chapter 95 of the 2024
Session Laws of Kansas, 75-7202, as amended by section 19 of chapter 95
of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas, 75-7203, 75-7203, as amended by
section 21 of chapter 95 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas, 75-7205, as
amended by section 23 of chapter 95 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas,
75-7206, as amended by section 25 of chapter 95 of the 2024 Session
Laws of Kansas, 75-7206a, 75-7208, as amended by section 27 of chapter
95 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas, 75-7208a, 75-7209, as amended
by section 29 of chapter 95 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas, 75-7237,
as amended by section 31 of chapter 95 of the 2024 Session Laws of
Kansas, 75-7238, as amended by section 33 of chapter 95 of the 2024
Session Laws of Kansas, 75-7239, as amended by section 35 of chapter 95
of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas, 75-7240, as amended by section 37
of chapter 95 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas, 75-7245 and 75-7246
are hereby repealed.
Sec. 12. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.